Utah statutes.
10-3-922.   Term of bail commissioners -- Salary -- Bond and oath.
(1)  A bail commissioner appointed under this part shall:
(a)  serve at the pleasure of the governing body or mayor that appoints him;
and
(b)  receive no compensation as a bail commissioner.
(2)  Before beginning his duties as a bail  commissioner, he shall:
(a)  take and subscribe an oath to faithfully and impartially discharge the
duties of his office;
(b)  give a $2,500 bond to the city wherein he is appointed, with two good and
sufficient individual sureties or with a single corporate surety, that is
approved by the governing body or mayor appointing him for the faithful
performance of his duties as a bail commissioner; and
(c)  account for and turn over to the clerk of the  appropriate court within
three days receipt of all moneys, bonds, property, and records coming into his
hands as a bail commissioner.
(3)  At the expiration of his term of office, the bail commissioner shall
surrender and turn over all funds, bonds, property, papers and records then in
his hands pertaining to his office.
(4)  Suit upon any bond issued under this section may be brought by any
county, city, or person injured as a result of a bail commissioner's action.
